West Virginia, session 2025, HB2259.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of Homeland Security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. West Virginia State Police. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 28, 2024, authorized under the authority of §15-2-25 of this code, modified by the State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 1, 2024, relating to the State Police (cadet selection, 81 CSR 02), is authorized.